Hawaii statutes.
§49-22 Consent of another county. No
county shall construct an undertaking or administer a loan program wholly or
partly within the corporate limits of another county except with the consent of
the governing body of the other county. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next